Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.56.090

New bank may be authorized.

If the net assets of a bank operating under such a plan are sufficient to provide the capital and surplus of a newly organized bank in the same place, the director, under such reasonable conditions as he or she shall prescribe, may approve the incorporation of a new bank and permit it to take over the assets and business and assume the liabilities of the existing bank.

[ 1994 c 92 s 156; 1955 c 33 s 30.56.090. Prior: 1933 c 49 s 9; RRS s 3293-9. Formerly RCW 30.56.090.]